Utah statutes.
26-21-5.   Duties of committee.

The committee shall:

(1)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(a)  for the licensing of health-care facilities; and

(b)  requiring the submission of architectural plans and specifications for any proposed new health-care facility or renovation to the department for review;

(2)  approve the information for applications for licensure pursuant to Section 26-21-9;

(3)  advise the department as requested concerning the interpretation and enforcement of the rules established under this chapter; and

(4)  advise, consult, cooperate with, and provide technical assistance to other agencies of the state and federal government, and other states and affected groups or persons in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

